Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-154
State plan; administer federal aid.

Consistent with federal law, the department, in connection with the administration of sections 43-147 to 43-154 and any compact entered into pursuant to such sections, shall include in any state plan made pursuant to the Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980, Public Law 96-272, Titles IV(e) and XIX of the Social Security Act, and any other applicable federal laws, the provision of adoption assistance and medical assistance for which the federal government pays some or all of the cost. The department shall apply for and administer all relevant federal aid in accordance with law.

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 8.